Utah statutes.
70A-8-506.   Duty of securities intermediary to exercise rights as directed
by entitlement holder.
A securities intermediary shall exercise rights with respect to a financial
asset if directed to do so by an entitlement holder.  A securities
intermediary satisfies the duty if:
(1)  the securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon
by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary; or
(2)  in the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary either places
the entitlement holder in a position to exercise the rights directly or
exercises due care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to
follow the direction of the entitlement holder.
